New York, session 2025-2026, S3217.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Article 27 of the environmental conservation law is amended 2 by adding a new title 34 to read as follows: 3 TITLE 34 4 EXTENDED PRODUCER RESPONSIBILITY FOR TEXTILES 5 Section 27-3401. Definitions. 6 27-3403. Textile disposal ban. 7 27-3405. Producer plan. 8 27-3407. Producer responsibilities. 9 27-3409. Retailer, distributor and wholesaler responsibilities. 10 27-3411. Department responsibilities. 11 27-3413. Labeling requirements. 12 27-3415. Textile stewardship advisory board. 13 27-3417. Post-consumer requirements. 14 27-3419. Enforcement and penalties. 15 27-3421. Limits of liability for antitrust, restraint of trade, 16 or unfair trade practices. 17 27-3423. Rules and regulations. 18 § 27-3401. Definitions. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06967-09-6 S. 3217--C 2 1 For the purposes of this title, the following terms shall have the 2 following meanings: 3 1. "Apparel" means clothing and accessory items intended for regular 4 wear or formal occasions, including, but not limited to, undergarments, 5 shirts, pants, skirts, dresses, overalls, bodysuits, costumes, vests, 6 dancewear, suits, saris, scarves, tops, leggings, school uniforms, leis- 7 urewear, athletic wear, sports uniforms, everyday swimwear, formal wear, 8 onesies, bibs, diapers, footwear, and everyday uniforms for workwear. 9 Clothing items intended for regular wear or formal occasions does not 10 include personal protective equipment or clothing items for exclusive 11 use by the United States military. 12 2. "Brand" means a trademark, including both a registered trademark 13 and an unregistered trademark, a logo, a name, a symbol, a word, an 14 identifier, or a traceable mark that identifies a covered textile and 15 identifies the owner or licensee of the brand. 16 3. "Collection program" or "program" means a program financed and 17 implemented by producers, either individually, or through a represen- 18 tative organization, that provides for, but is not limited to, the 19 collection, transportation, reuse, recycling, proper end-of-life manage- 20 ment, or an appropriate combination thereof, or discarded products. 21 4. "Collection site" means a permanent location in the state at which 22 discarded products may be returned by a consumer. Collection sites shall 23 accept all types of discarded products as defined by this title regard- 24 less of brand. 25 5. "Consumer" means a person located in the state who purchases, owns, 26 leases, or uses covered products, including but not limited to an indi- 27 vidual, a business, corporation, limited partnership, not-for-profit 28 corporation, the state, a public corporation, public school, school 29 district, private or parochial school or board of cooperative educa- 30 tional services or governmental entity. 31 6. "Covered product" means any product that is a textile or textile 32 article, as defined in this section. 33 7. "Discarded product" means a covered product that a consumer has 34 used and disposed of in the state and is no longer used for its manufac- 35 tured purpose. 36 8. "Distributor" or "wholesaler" means a person who buys or otherwise 37 acquires a covered product and sells or offers to sell such product to 38 retailers in this state. 39 9. "Energy recovery" means the process by which all or a portion of 40 solid waste materials are processed or combusted in order to utilize the 41 heat content or other forms of energy derived from such solid waste 42 materials. 43 10. "Producer" means any person who manufactures a covered product 44 that is sold, offered for sale, or distributed in this state under the 45 manufacturer's own name or brand. "Producer" includes: 46 (a) the owner of a trademark or brand under which a covered product is 47 sold, offered for sale, or distributed in this state, whether or not 48 such trademark or brand is registered in the state; and 49 (b) any person who imports a covered product into the United States 50 that is sold or offered for sale in the state and that is manufactured 51 by a person who does not have a presence in the United States. 52 11. "Recycling" or "recycle" means to separate, dismantle or process 53 the materials, components, or commodities contained in covered products 54 for the purpose of preparing the materials, components or commodities 55 for use or reuse in new products or components. "Recycling" or "recycle" 56 does not include: (a) energy recovery or energy generation by any means, S. 3217--C 3 1 including but not limited to, combustion, incineration, pyrolysis, gasi- 2 fication, solvolysis, or waste to fuel; (b) any chemical conversion 3 process; or (c) landfill disposal. 4 12. "Recycling rate" means the percentage of discarded product that is 5 managed through recycling or reuse, as defined by this title, and is 6 computed by dividing the amount of recycled output derived from 7 collected covered product, plus any pounds sent for reuse by the esti- 8 mated total of discarded product generated during a program year. 9 13. "Representative organization" means a not-for-profit organization 10 established by a producer or a group of producers to implement a 11 collection program. 12 14. "Retailer" means any person who sells or offers for sale a covered 13 product to a consumer in the state. 14 15. "Reuse" means the return of a product into the economic stream for 15 use in the same kind of application as the product was originally 16 intended to be used, without a change in the product's identity. 17 16. "Sale" or "sell" means any transfer for consideration of title or 18 the right to use, from a manufacturer or retailer to a person, includ- 19 ing, but not limited to, transactions conducted through retail sale 20 outlets, catalogs, mail, the telephone, the internet, or any electronic 21 means; "sale" or "sell" shall not include donations or reuse. 22 17. "Textile" means any item made in whole or in part from natural, 23 manmade, or synthetic fiber, yarn, or fabric, and includes, but is not 24 limited to, leather, cotton, silk, jute, hemp, wool, viscose, nylon, or 25 polyester. "Textile" does not include disposable hygiene products made 26 from paper, including, but not limited to, toilet paper, paper towels or 27 tissues, or disposable absorbent hygiene products. 28 18. "Textile articles" means textile goods of a type customarily used 29 in households and businesses, and includes, but is not limited to, 30 apparel, accessories, handbags, backpacks, draperies, shower curtains, 31 furnishings, upholstery, bedding towels, napkins, and tablecloths. 32 "Textile articles" does not include: (a) carpets and rugs as defined in 33 title thirty-three of this article; (b) treatments containing polyfluo- 34 roalkyl for use on converted textiles or leathers; (c) component parts 35 from a vehicle, as defined in section one hundred fifty-nine of the 36 vehicle and traffic law, such as seats and carpets or synthetic floor- 37 ing; (d) component parts from a vessel, as defined in section two of the 38 navigation law, such as seats, synthetic flooring, and boat covers; (e) 39 filtration media and filter products used in industrial applications, 40 including, but not limited to, chemical or pharmaceutical manufacturing 41 and environmental control technologies; (f) textile articles used in or 42 for laboratory analysis and testing; (g) component parts from an 43 aircraft, as defined in section two hundred forty of the general busi- 44 ness law; or (h) stadium shades, architectural fabric structures, or any 45 permanent fabric structure that is intrinsic to a building's design or 46 construction. 47 § 27-3403. Textile disposal ban. 48 1. Beginning three years from the effective date of this title, no 49 person shall knowingly dispose of any textile as solid waste in the 50 state at any time. 51 2. Beginning six months from the effective date of this title, no 52 retailer, distributor, wholesaler, manufacturer, or owner or operator of 53 a textile collection site, textile waste consolidation facility, or 54 textile waste recycling facility in the state shall dispose of textile 55 waste at a solid waste management facility or hazardous waste management 56 facility, or place textile waste for collection which is intended for S. 3217--C 4 1 disposal at a solid waste management facility or hazardous waste manage- 2 ment facility. 3 3. Beginning two years from the effective date of this title, no 4 person, except for an individual or household, shall place or dispose of 5 any textile waste in any solid waste management facility, or place 6 textile waste for collection which is intended for disposal at a solid 7 waste management facility or hazardous waste management facility in this 8 state. Persons engaged in the collection of solid waste for delivery to 9 a solid waste management facility shall provide written information to 10 users of such facility on the proper methods for the recycling of 11 textile waste. 12 4. Beginning three years from the effective date of this title, no 13 individual or household shall place or dispose of any textile waste, 14 that exceeds an amount as determined by the department, in any solid 15 waste management facility, or place textile waste for collection which 16 is intended for disposal at a solid waste management facility or hazard- 17 ous waste management facility in this state. 18 5. Beginning two years from the effective date of this title, an owner 19 or operator of a solid waste management facility or hazardous waste 20 management facility shall educate users of such facility on the proper 21 methods for the management of textile waste. Such education shall 22 include: 23 (a) providing written information to users of such facility on the 24 proper methods for recycling of textile waste; and 25 (b) posting, in conspicuous locations at such facility, signs stating 26 that textile waste may not be disposed of at the facility. 27 § 27-3405. Producer plan. 28 1. No later than eighteen months after the effective date of this 29 title, a producer, either individually or cooperatively in a group with 30 one or more producers or with a representative organization, shall 31 submit to the department for the department's approval a plan for the 32 establishment of a collection program that meets the requirements of the 33 program described in this section. 34 2. A producer may satisfy the collection program requirement of this 35 section by agreeing to participate collectively with a group of other 36 producers or with a representative organization. Any such producer 37 participating collectively in a collection program shall notify the 38 department of such participation. 39 3. A producer or representative organization shall update the plan, as 40 needed, when there are changes proposed to the current program. A new 41 plan or amendment shall be required to be submitted to the department 42 for approval when: 43 (a) there is a revision of the program's goals; or 44 (b) every three years from the date of approval of a previous plan. 45 4. The plan submitted by the producer or representative organization 46 to the department under this section shall, at a minimum: 47 (a) provide a list of each participating producer and brand covered by 48 the program; 49 (b) provide information on the products covered by the program; 50 (c) describe how the producer or representative organization will 51 collect, transport, recycle, and process covered products; 52 (d) describe how the program will provide for the collection of 53 covered products in the state, free of cost and in a manner convenient 54 to consumers, including how the program will achieve, at a minimum, a 55 convenience standard that ensures that all counties of the state and all 56 municipalities that have a population of ten thousand or greater have at S. 3217--C 5 1 least one permanent collection site and one additional permanent 2 collection site for every thirty thousand people located in those areas, 3 that accepts covered products from consumers during normal business 4 hours; however, with respect to a city having a population of one 5 million or more, after consultation with the department of sanitation of 6 such city, the department may otherwise establish an alternative conven- 7 ience standard. The producer or representative organization may coordi- 8 nate the program with existing municipal waste collection infrastructure 9 as is mutually agreeable. Convenience standards shall be evaluated by 10 the department periodically and the department may require additional 11 collection locations to ensure adequate consumer convenience; 12 (e) describe how the discarded covered products will be safely and 13 securely transported, tracked, and handled from collection sites through 14 final recycling and processing; 15 (f) describe the methods to be used to reuse or recycle discarded 16 covered products to ensure that the components, to the extent feasible, 17 are transformed or remanufactured into finished products for use; 18 (g) describe the methods to be used to manage or dispose of discarded 19 products that cannot be recycled or reused; 20 (h) describe in detail education and outreach efforts to inform 21 consumers and others engaged in the management of discarded covered 22 products about the program, including, at a minimum, an internet website 23 and a toll-free telephone number and written information included at the 24 time of sale of covered products that provides sufficient information to 25 allow a consumer to learn how to return such covered products for 26 disposal, recycling or reuse; 27 (i) describe how the program will meet annual performance goals, as 28 determined by the department, provided that at a minimum, the program 29 shall achieve the following recycling rates for textiles: 30 (i) a thirty percent recycling rate for textiles by five years after 31 the plan is approved by the department pursuant to section 27-3411 of 32 this title; 33 (ii) a fifty percent recycling rate for textiles by ten years after 34 the plan is approved by the department pursuant to section 27-3411 of 35 this title; 36 (iii) a seventy-five percent recycling rate for textiles by fifteen 37 years after the plan is approved by the department pursuant to section 38 27-3411 of this title. 39 (j) describe what, if any, incentives will be used to encourage 40 retailer participation; 41 (k) describe the outreach and education methods that will be used to 42 encourage municipal landfill and transfer station participation; 43 (l) describe the methods to be used to reuse or recycle discarded 44 covered products; 45 (m) describe what, if any, incentives will be used to encourage 46 retailer participation; 47 (n) estimate the amounts of covered products that were previously 48 sold, offered for sale, or distributed in the state under each produc- 49 er's name or brand that are discarded in the state annually and describe 50 the sources of data and methodology for estimating such amount; and 51 (o) any other information as specified by the department. 52 § 27-3407. Producer responsibilities. 53 1. Beginning no later than twenty-four months after the effective date 54 of this title, the producer or representative organization shall imple- 55 ment a collection program utilizing collection sites established pursu- S. 3217--C 6 1 ant to paragraph (d) of subdivision four of section 27-3405 of this 2 title. 3 2. A producer shall not sell, or offer for sale, covered products to 4 any person in the state unless the producer is implementing or partic- 5 ipating under an approved plan. 6 3. The collection program shall be free to the consumer, convenient, 7 and adequate to serve the needs of such consumers in all areas of the 8 state on an ongoing basis. 9 4. A producer or representative organization shall maintain records 10 demonstrating compliance with the provisions of this title and make them 11 available for audit and inspection by the department for a period of 12 three years. The department shall make such records available to the 13 public upon request in accordance with the provisions of the state free- 14 dom of information law and the regulations promulgated thereunder. 15 Record holders shall submit the records required to comply with such 16 request within sixty working days of written notification by the depart- 17 ment of receipt of the request. 18 5. A producer or representative organization shall be responsible for 19 all costs associated with the implementation of the collection program, 20 including but not limited to the cost of collection. A producer or 21 representative organization shall pay costs incurred by the department 22 in the administration and enforcement of this title. Exclusive of fines 23 and penalties, the department shall only be reimbursed its actual cost 24 of administration and enforcement. 25 6. Any person who becomes a producer on or after two years from the 26 effective date of this title shall submit a plan to the department, or 27 notify the department that it has joined an existing plan, prior to 28 selling or offering for sale in the state any covered products and shall 29 comply with the requirements of this title. 30 7. Within eighteen months following approval of the producer plan, and 31 annually thereafter, a producer or representative organization shall 32 submit a report to the department that includes, for the previous 33 program year, a description of the program including, but not limited to 34 the following: 35 (a) a detailed description of the methods used to collect, transport, 36 and process covered products in the state, including collection methods 37 made available to consumers and an evaluation of the program's 38 collection convenience; 39 (b) identification of all collection sites in the state; 40 (c) the estimated weight of all discarded covered products collected 41 and reused or recycled pursuant to the collection program; 42 (d) an evaluation of whether the performance goals and recycling rates 43 have been achieved and a description of any modifications necessary to 44 achieve such goals; 45 (e) the estimated weight of discarded covered products and any compo- 46 nent materials that were collected pursuant to the collection program, 47 but not recycled; 48 (f) the total cost of implementing the program; 49 (g) samples of all educational materials provided to consumers and a 50 detailed list of efforts undertaken and an evaluation of methods used to 51 disseminate such materials including recommendations, if any, for how 52 the educational component of the program can be improved; and 53 (h) any other information required by the department. 54 § 27-3409. Retailer, distributor and wholesaler responsibilities. 55 1. Beginning thirty months after the effective date of this title, no 56 retailer, distributor, or wholesaler may sell or offer for sale covered S. 3217--C 7 1 products in the state unless the producer of such covered product is 2 participating in a collection program. A retailer, distributor or whole- 3 saler, shall be in compliance with this section if, on the date the 4 covered products are offered for sale, the producer is listed on the 5 department's website as implementing or participating in an approved 6 collection program or if the covered products brand is listed on the 7 department's website as being included in the program. 8 2. Any retailer, distributor, or wholesaler may participate, on a 9 voluntary basis, as a designated collections site pursuant to a 10 collection program and in accordance with all applicable laws and regu- 11 lations. 12 § 27-3411. Department responsibilities. 13 1. The department shall (a) maintain a list of producers who are 14 implementing or participating pursuant to section 27-3405 of this title, 15 (b) maintain a list of such producer's brands, and (c) post such lists 16 on the department's website. 17 2. Beginning thirty months after the effective date of this title, the 18 department shall post on its website the location of all collection 19 sites identified to the department by the producer in its plans and 20 annual reports. 21 3. The department shall post on its website each producer plan 22 approved by the department. 23 4. Within ninety days after receipt of a proposed plan or plan amend- 24 ment, the department shall approve or reject the plan or plan amendment. 25 If the plan or plan amendment is approved, the department shall notify 26 the producer or representative organization in writing. If the depart- 27 ment rejects the plan or plan amendment, the department shall notify the 28 producer or representative organization in writing stating the reason 29 for rejecting the plan or plan amendment. A producer or representative 30 organization whose plan is rejected shall submit a revised plan to the 31 department within thirty days of receiving a notice of rejection. If the 32 department rejects the subsequent proposal, the producer or producers at 33 issue shall be out of compliance and subject to enforcement provisions. 34 5. The department shall submit a report regarding the implementation 35 of this title to the governor and legislature by no later than three 36 years after the effective date of this title and every year thereafter. 37 The report shall include, at minimum, an evaluation of: 38 (a) the stream of covered products in the state; 39 (b) disposal, recycling, and reuse rates in the state covered 40 products; 41 (c) a discussion of compliance and enforcement related to the require- 42 ments of this title; and 43 (d) recommendations for any changes to this title. 44 § 27-3413. Labeling requirements. 45 One year after the plan is approved by the department pursuant to 46 section 27-3411 of this title, covered products sold or offered for sale 47 in the state shall be accompanied by the name of the producer and the 48 producer's contact information. 49 § 27-3415. Textile stewardship advisory board. 50 1. There is hereby established within the department a textile 51 collection program advisory board to make recommendations to the commis- 52 sioner regarding program operator plans required by this title. 53 2. The board shall be composed of twelve voting members. Such members 54 shall include: 55 (a) one representative of textile producers; 56 (b) two representatives of textile retailers; S. 3217--C 8 1 (c) one representative of textile recyclers; 2 (d) two representatives of textile collectors; 3 (e) one representative of a company that utilizes discarded covered 4 products to manufacture a new product; 5 (f) one representative from a statewide environmental organization; 6 (g) one representative from a statewide waste disposal association; 7 (h) one representative from the New York product stewardship council; 8 (i) one representative from a consumer organization; and 9 (j) one representative from a statewide recycling organization. 10 3. The members shall be appointed as follows: 11 (a) two members to be appointed by the temporary president of the 12 senate; 13 (b) two members to be appointed by the speaker of the assembly; 14 (c) one member to be appointed by the minority leader of the senate; 15 (d) one member to be appointed by the minority leader of the assembly; 16 and 17 (e) six members to be appointed by the governor. 18 4. Such appointments shall be made no later than the first day of 19 January following the date on which this title takes effect. The members 20 shall designate a chair from among the members by majority vote. Board 21 members shall receive no compensation but shall be entitled to their 22 necessary and actual expenses incurred in the performance of their board 23 duties. 24 5. The board shall meet at least biannually by call of the chair. 25 § 27-3417. Post-consumer requirements. 26 All covered products sold in the state shall be manufactured with the 27 following minimum amounts from post-consumer sources: 28 1. Within one year after the plan is approved by the department pursu- 29 ant to section 27-3411 of this title, a minimum of ten percent post-con- 30 sumer contents; 31 2. Within four years thereafter, a minimum of twenty percent post-con- 32 sumer content; and 33 3. Five years thereafter, a minimum of thirty percent post-consumer 34 content. 35 § 27-3419. Enforcement and penalties. 36 1. Any producer, representative organization, or retailer who violates 37 any provision of or fails to perform any duty imposed pursuant to this 38 title shall be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five hundred 39 dollars for each violation and an additional penalty of not more than 40 five hundred dollars for each day during which such violations continue. 41 Civil penalties under this section shall be assessed by the department 42 after a hearing or opportunity to be heard pursuant to the provisions of 43 section 71-1709 of this chapter. 44 2. In a city with a population of one million or more, such city 45 shall, in addition to any authority otherwise conferred in this chapter, 46 have concurrent authority to enforce, by an agency or agencies desig- 47 nated for such purpose by the mayor of such city, the provisions of 48 sections 27-3403 and 27-3409 of this title. Any notice of violation 49 issued by an agency designated by the mayor of such city charging a 50 violation of section 27-3403 or 27-3409 of this title shall be return- 51 able to the environmental control board of such city. Such environmental 52 control board shall have the power to impose the civil penalties set 53 forth in subdivision one of this section. All civil penalties collected 54 for any violation of this title that have been imposed by the environ- 55 mental control board of such city shall be paid into the general fund of 56 such city. S. 3217--C 9 1 § 27-3421. Limits on liability for antitrust, restraint of trade, or 2 unfair trade practices. 3 1. A producer, representative organization, or retailer shall not be 4 liable for any claim of a violation of antitrust, restraint of trade, or 5 unfair trade practice laws arising from the performance of an action 6 required to be undertaken by this title which is necessary to implement 7 or participate under a producer plan approved by the department, solely 8 to increase the collection and recycling of covered products, which 9 affects the types and quantities being collected and recycled or the 10 cost and structure of such collection program that the producer, repre- 11 sentative organization, or retailer is participating in pursuant to this 12 title. 13 2. Provided, however, that subdivision one of this section shall not 14 apply to any agreement establishing or affecting the price of covered 15 products, except, as necessary, to fulfill producer responsibility under 16 subdivision five of section 27-3407 of this title, the output or 17 production of covered products, or restricting the geographic area or 18 customers to which covered products will be sold. 19 § 27-3423. Rules and regulations. 20 The department is hereby authorized to promulgate any rules and regu- 21 lations necessary to implement this title. 22 § 2. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 97-uuuu 23 to read as follows: 24 § 97-uuuu. Textile extended producer responsibility fund. 1. There is 25 hereby established in the joint custody of the state comptroller and the 26 commissioner of environmental conservation a special fund to be known as 27 the "textile extended producer responsibility fund". 28 2. Such fund shall consist of all revenues received by the comp- 29 troller, pursuant to the provisions of section 27-3419 of the environ- 30 mental conservation law and all other moneys appropriated thereto from 31 any other fund or source pursuant to law. Nothing contained in this 32 section shall prevent the state from receiving grants, gifts, or 33 bequests for the purposes of the fund as defined in this section and 34 depositing them into the fund according to law. 35 3. The moneys of the textile extended producer responsibility fund, 36 following appropriation by the legislature, shall be allocated for the 37 direct costs associated with extended producer responsibility for 38 textiles pursuant to title thirty-four of article twenty-seven of the 39 environmental conservation law. 40 4. The state comptroller may invest any moneys in the textile extended 41 producer responsibility fund not expended for the purpose of this 42 section as provided by law. The state comptroller shall credit any 43 interest and income derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in 44 the textile extended producer responsibility fund to the textile 45 extended producer responsibility fund. 46 5. Any unexpected and unencumbered moneys remaining in the textile 47 extended producer responsibility fund at the end of a fiscal year shall 48 remain in the textile extended producer responsibility fund and shall 49 not be credited to any other fund. 50 § 3. Section 71-1701 of the environmental conservation law, as amended 51 by chapter 795 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as follows: 52 § 71-1701. Applicability of this title. 53 This title shall be applicable to the enforcement of titles 1 through 54 11 and titles 15 through 19 of article 17; article 19; and titles 1 55 [and], 33 and 34 of article 27 of this chapter. 56 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.